Connecticut, session 2026, HB05120.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
___ dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the Department of
Transportation for the purpose of installing traffic calming measures on
state roads in the towns of Bloomfield and West Hartford.